Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislators’ Retirement Plan

6.500.
Legislators’ Retirement Plan — Creation.

There hereby is created a retirement plan for the members of the General Assembly (hereinafter “legislators”). Each legislator in office on July 1, 1980, and each legislator thereafter taking office, may acquire membership in the plan in accordance with the provisions of KRS

6.505

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 12, effective July 1, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 9, effective July 13, 1984.

6.505.
Election to participate — Amendment of benefits and rights — Contribution — Effect on membership in other retirement plans — Repurchase of Kentucky Employees Retirement System credit lost by refund.

Each legislator in office on July 1, 1980, may within thirty (30) days after that date, and any legislator thereafter taking office may within thirty (30) days after the date thereof, elect to make monthly contributions to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, in an amount equal to five percent (5%) of his or her monthly creditable compensation, as defined in KRS 61.510(13). The election shall be effective to establish membership in the plan as of July 1, 1980, or as of the date from which the thirty (30) day period is measured, as the case may be. Provided, however, that any legislator who was in office on July 1, 1980, and who is in office at the time he or she makes the election may, after the expiration of the thirty (30) day period and until May 1, 1982, make the election, in which event he or she shall pay to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, for the months between July 1, 1980, and the date of his or her election such sum as, when added to any member’s contribution by him or her that is transferred from another retirement system under KRS

6.535

, will equal the member’s contribution required by this section. If the member makes his or her election after February 1, 1981, he or she shall in addition pay to the plan interest on the foregoing sum, at six percent (6%) per annum, calculated as if the sum consisted of equal monthly payments, one (1) of which was due at the end of each month between July 1, 1980, and the date the election was made. The election shall be addressed to and filed with the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and shall constitute an authorization to the secretary to thereafter cause to be deducted from the member’s monthly creditable compensation an amount equal to five percent (5%) thereof, as a voluntarily elected contribution by the member towards the funding of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan.

For a member who begins participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, the election shall operate to create an inviolable contract between such member and the Commonwealth, guaranteeing to and vesting in the member the rights and benefits provided for under KRS

6.515

to

6.530

.

For members who begin participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, the General Assembly reserves the right to amend, suspend, or reduce the benefits and rights provided under KRS

6.500

to

6.577

if, in its judgment, the welfare of the Commonwealth so demands, except that the amount of benefits the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction shall not be affected.

For purposes of this subparagraph, the amount of benefits the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction shall be limited to the accumulated account balance the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction.

The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the General Assembly’s authority to change any other benefit or right specified by KRS

6.500

to

6.577

, for members who begin participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, except the benefits specified by subparagraph 2.b. of this paragraph.

The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to limit the General Assembly’s authority to amend, reduce, or suspend the benefits and rights of members of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan as provided by KRS 6.500 to 6.577 that the General Assembly had the authority to amend, reduce, or suspend, prior to July 1, 2013.

An election once made under this section either to participate or not to participate in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, shall be considered to apply to all future service as a legislator, whether in the same or a different office as a legislator, and whether or not it is in successive terms.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection:

A legislator who becomes a member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, shall make monthly contributions to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan in an amount equal to six percent (6%) of his or her monthly creditable compensation, as defined in KRS 61.510(13);

A legislator who becomes a member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, shall make monthly contributions to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan in an amount equal to six percent (6%) of his or her monthly creditable compensation, as defined in KRS 61.510(13), of which:

Five percent (5%) of his or her monthly creditable compensation, as defined in KRS 61.510(13), shall be used to provide funding for benefits provided under KRS

21.402

; and

One percent (1%) of his or her monthly creditable compensation, as defined in KRS 61.510(13), shall be used exclusively to help fund retiree health benefits as provided by KRS 6.577 and shall not be refunded to the member if the member withdraws his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

21.460

. The amounts deducted under this subdivision shall be credited to an account established pursuant to 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(h)

, within the fund established by KRS

6.530

.

A legislator entitled to elect membership in the retirement system who failed to elect membership within thirty (30) days after taking office may elect membership not later than August 31, 2005. An election, upon being made pursuant to this section, shall operate to create an inviolable contract between the member entitled to elect membership under this subsection and the Commonwealth, guaranteeing to and vesting in the member the rights and benefits provided for under the terms and conditions of KRS

6.500

to

6.577

.

When any legislator makes a delayed election of membership in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan under subsection (2) of this section, his or her active membership in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System shall terminate, as of the date his or her membership in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan becomes effective, and any credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, earned for service as a legislator, which he or she then has or which he or she subsequently regains while being an active member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, shall be transferred to and counted as service credit in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, and shall no longer constitute credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, except for the purpose of validating any other credit in that system if the member pays the difference, if any, between the amount transferred from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System and the actuarial value of the transferred service. However, any credit he or she then has in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, earned for service in any capacity other than a legislator, shall not be affected. No person may attain credit in more than one (1) of the retirement plans or systems mentioned in this section for the same period of service. When credit is transferred from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System shall transfer to the Legislators’ Retirement Fund an amount equal to the employee’s and employer’s contributions attributable to that credit, together with interest on the contributions from the date made to the date of transfer at the actuarially assumed interest rate of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System in effect at the time the contributions were made, compounded annually at that same interest rate.

The state shall, solely for the purpose of compliance with Section 414(h) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, pick up the employee contributions required by this section for all compensation earned after August 1, 1982, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code and KRS

141.010

. The picked-up employee contribution shall satisfy all obligations to the retirement system satisfied prior to August 1, 1982, by the employee contribution, and the picked-up employee contribution shall be in lieu of an employee contribution. The state shall pay these picked-up employee contributions from the same source of funds which is used to pay earnings to the employee. The employee shall have no option to receive the contributed amounts directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the system. Employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, shall be treated for all purposes of KRS

6.500

to

6.535

in the same manner and to the same extent as employee contributions made prior to August 1, 1982.

When any legislator elects membership in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan in accordance with this section, his or her active membership in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, or Teachers’ Retirement System shall terminate, as of the date his or her membership in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan becomes effective, and any credit in such other system or systems, earned for service as a legislator, which he or she then has or which he or she subsequently regains while being an active member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, shall be transferred to and counted as service credit in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, and shall no longer constitute credit in such other retirement system except for the purpose of validating any other credit in that system. However, any credit he or she then has in such other retirement system, earned for service in any capacity other than a legislator, shall not be affected. No person may attain credit in more than one (1) of the retirement plans or systems mentioned in this section, for the same period of service.

A member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan who would be entitled, under KRS

61.552

, to repurchase credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, for previous service as a legislator, which credit had been lost by refund of contributions, may pay the amount required by KRS

61.552

directly to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan and thereby obtain credit in that plan for such service, rather than making payment to the Kentucky Employees Retirement System for credit which would be transferred to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan. In such event, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System shall transfer to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan an amount equal to the employer’s contributions that originally were made to the Kentucky Employees Retirement System for the regained service credit, with interest as provided in KRS

6.535

. Six (6) months’ current service shall be required in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan in order for the repurchased credit to remain in force, the same as provided in KRS 61.552. Service purchased under this subsection on or after January 1, 2014, shall not be used to determine the member’s participation date in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 13, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 166, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 458, § 4, effective April 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. VII D, § 640, effective April 11, 1990; 2005, ch. 86, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2008 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 3, effective June 27, 2008; 2013, ch. 120, § 13, effective July 1, 2013; 2014, ch. 71, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 171, § 63, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 63, effective April 26, 2018; 2022 ch. 55, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

Compiler's Notes.

Section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in (4), may be found as 26 USCS § 414(h).

6.515.
Terms of service to qualify — Military service credit acquisition for members who began participating before January 1, 2014 — Special provisions for active members who began participating before January 1, 2014.

Service credit in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan shall be acquired only by service as a legislator after July 1, 1980, while a member of the plan, by transfer of credit as provided in KRS

6.505

, or by purchase or transfer of credit as provided in this section.

Any active member who began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who has at least five (5) years of service credit in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, or his beneficiary acting in his place if the member dies prior to retirement, shall receive service credit for a maximum of four (4) years for his period of service in the Armed Forces of the United States, if his discharge therefrom is honorable and he has not been credited with the service by any other retirement system administered by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, by paying the retirement system thirty-five percent (35%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate which applies to the legislator in question under KRS

6.520

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan.
(2) (a) 1. Any active member who began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who has at least five (5) years of service credit in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, or his beneficiary acting in his place if the member dies prior to retirement, shall receive service credit for a maximum of four (4) years for his period of service in the Armed Forces of the United States, if his discharge therefrom is honorable and he has not been credited with the service by any other retirement system administered by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, by paying the retirement system thirty-five percent (35%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate which applies to the legislator in question under KRS

6.520

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan.

Any active member who began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who has at least five (5) years of service credit in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan may purchase and receive service credit for one (1) month of service for each six (6) months of service in the reserves or the National Guard by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on the assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate that applies to the legislator in question under KRS 6.520. Service credit awarded as provided in this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan. The service in the military reserves or the National Guard shall be treated as service earned prior to participation in the plan. The purchase can be made by the member by transfer, if authorized under subsection (7)(d) of this section, or in a lump-sum payment or by installment payments, as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection. The payment shall not be picked up by the employer as provided in KRS 6.505(4).

The member, if the member began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may purchase all of his military service credit at one (1) time, or in increments of no less than one (1) year, unless there is a fraction remaining after all full years have been paid for. Payment of the total or the increment may be made by lump-sum or by monthly installments through payroll deduction. If the member chooses to pay by installment, the cost of the service credit shall be computed in the same manner as for a lump-sum payment, which shall be the principal. Interest, at the annual actuarial rate in effect at the time each payment is made, shall be added to each monthly payment at the rate of one-twelfth (1/12) of the annual interest rate applied to the declining principal amount. Installment purchases shall be for no less than twelve (12) nor more than sixty (60) months. If the member leaves office before completing his installment payments, he may satisfy his contract by a lump-sum payment of the remaining principal amount, but no further installment payments shall be accepted thereafter. In this case, the member shall be credited with the military service credit for which he has paid, in years or months but no fraction less than a full month, and any payment remaining after credit for full months has been awarded shall be returned to the member.

The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 6.505(4).

In the event of divorce, rights to benefits shall be considered marital property subject to the provisions of KRS

403.190

.

A member who began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who has qualified for benefits under KRS 6.525(1) may transfer to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan up to ten (10) years of service credit which he has earned in a retirement system administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems. If the member elects to transfer his service credit, the system from which the transfer is made shall transfer to the legislators’ retirement fund an amount equal to the employee’s and employer’s contributions attributable to that credit, together with interest on the contributions from the date made to date of transfer at the actuarially assumed interest rate of the system from which the transfer is made in effect at the time the contributions were made, compounded annually at that same interest rate. The member shall be entitled to the transferred service credit, at the rate at which he qualifies under KRS

6.520

, when he pays the total difference between the amount of the funds transferred and the cost of the credit to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, as determined by the actuary for the Legislators’ Retirement Plan. The member may pay by transfer, if authorized under subsection (7)(d) of this section, by lump sum, or by increments, as provided for in this section. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 6.505(4).

Any active member who began participating in the Legislators Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested in the Legislators Retirement Plan under KRS

6.525

shall receive service credit for a maximum of four (4) years each for his period of service as a Domestic Relations Commissioner, a Master Commissioner, or a District Court Trial Commissioner of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or a combination thereof, if the service has not been credited to the member’s account with any other public defined benefit plan, by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The period of service to be purchased shall be certified to the board of trustees by the custodian of the records. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate that applies to the member in question under KRS

6.520

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Legislators Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan. The member may pay by transfer, by lump sum, or by increments as set forth in this section. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 6.505(4).

Any active member who began participating in the Legislators Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who is vested in the Legislators Retirement Plan under KRS

6.525

, shall receive service credit for his period of service to the United States Government, other than service in the Armed Forces, if the service has not been credited to the member’s account with any other public defined benefit plan, by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The period of service to be purchased shall be certified to the board of trustees by the custodian of the records. The service credit shall be awarded and the cost shall be determined in conformity with the rate that applies to the member in question under KRS

6.520

. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Legislators Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan. The member may pay by transfer, by lump sum, or by increments as set forth in this section. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 6.505(4).

Any member who began participating in the Legislators Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who was in office on June 21, 2001, and who was in active contributing status to the applicable retirement plan on June 21, 2001, and who has at least one hundred eighty (180) months of service credit may purchase a combined maximum total of five (5) years of retirement service credit that is not otherwise purchasable, by paying the retirement system one hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost of the service as determined by the board of trustees, based on assumptions used in the most recent biennial evaluation. The member shall be entitled to the service credit at the rate at which he qualifies under KRS 6.520. Service credit awarded under this subsection shall be equivalent, for all purposes of the Legislators Retirement Plan, to other service credit earned in the plan, except that the service purchased under this subsection shall not be used in determining a retirement allowance until the member has accrued at least two hundred forty (240) months of service, excluding service purchased under this subsection. If the member does not accrue at least two hundred forty (240) months of service, excluding service purchased under this subsection, then upon retirement, death, or written request following termination, the payment shall be refunded. The member may pay by transfer, by lump sum, or by increments as set forth in this section. The payments made under this section shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 6.505(4).

A member who began participating in the Legislators Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may purchase service credit under the provisions of this section by transferring funds through a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer as permitted under the applicable sections of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations or rulings issued thereunder or through a direct rollover as contemplated by and permitted under 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(a)(31)

and any regulations or rulings issued thereunder. Service credit may also be purchased by a rollover of funds pursuant to and permitted under the rules specified in 26

U.S.C. sec. 402(c)

and 26

U.S.C. sec. 408(d)(3)

. The Legislators Retirement Fund shall accept the transfer or rollover to the extent permitted under the rules specified in the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations and rulings issued thereunder. The amount shall be credited to the individual member’s account and shall be considered accumulated contributions of the member and shall not be picked up by the employer under KRS 6.505(4).

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 14, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 458, § 16, effective April 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 222, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 480, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 266, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 389, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 146, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 258, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 128, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 86, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 120, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

6.518.
Limitations and exclusions on increases in creditable compensation in last five years of service in General Assembly for members retiring on or after January 1, 2018 — Exceptions for bona fide promotion or career development — Exclusion — Determination by board — Administrative regulations — Inapplicability to hybrid cash balance participants.

For purposes of this section, “bona fide promotion or career advancement”:

Means a professional advancement in substantially the same line of work held by the member in the four (4) years immediately prior to the final five (5) annual years preceding retirement or a change in employment position based on the training, skills, education, or expertise of the member that imposes a significant change in job duties and responsibilities to clearly justify the increased compensation to the member; and

Does not include any circumstance in which a legislator participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan takes a position of employment with an employer participating in any of the other state-administered retirement systems.

For members retiring on or after January 1, 2018, the plan shall, for each of the retiring member’s last five (5) annual years of service in the General Assembly or with any employer participating in any of the state-administered retirement systems, identify any annual year in which the creditable compensation used to calculate benefits in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan increased at a rate of ten percent (10%) or more annually over the immediately preceding annual year’s creditable compensation.

Except as limited or excluded by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any amount of increase in creditable compensation for an annual year identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection that exceeds ten percent (10%) more than the member’s creditable compensation from the immediately preceding annual year shall not be included in the creditable compensation used to calculate the member’s monthly pension benefits. If the creditable compensation for a specific annual year identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection as exceeding the ten percent (10%) increase limitation is not used to calculate the retiring member’s monthly pension benefits, then no reduction in creditable compensation shall occur for that annual year. Reductions to creditable compensation as provided by this paragraph shall include any creditable compensation used to calculate the retiring member’s benefits, including creditable compensation earned in another state-administered retirement system.

If the creditable compensation of the retiring member is reduced as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the retirement system shall, notwithstanding KRS

21.460

and as applicable, refund the member contributions attributable to the reduction in creditable compensation.

In order to ensure the prospective application of the limitations on increases in creditable compensation contained in subsection (2) of this section, only the creditable compensation earned by the retiring member on or after July 1, 2017, shall be subject to reduction under subsection (2) of this section. Creditable compensation earned by the retiring member prior to July 1, 2017, shall not be subject to reduction under subsection (2) of this section.

Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to increases that are the direct result of a bona fide promotion or career advancement.

The Judicial Form Retirement System board of trustees shall determine whether increases in creditable compensation during the last five (5) annual years of employment prior to retirement constitute a bona fide promotion or career advancement and may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section. All state-administered retirement systems shall cooperate to implement this section.

This section shall not apply to employees participating in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS

21.402

.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 125, § 1, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 55, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

6.520.
Retirement benefits for members who began participating before January 1, 2014.

A member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan who retires on or after his or her normal retirement date shall receive a service retirement allowance, payable monthly during his or her lifetime, in an amount per month equal to three and fifty one-hundredths percent (3.50%) of his or her final compensation multiplied by the number of years of his or her service, but in no event to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final compensation. For this purpose, “final compensation” means the average monthly creditable compensation as determined in KRS 61.510(13) of the member for services as a legislator for the three (3) years during which the member had the highest creditable legislative compensation.

A member shall have rights, with respect to retirement before reaching normal retirement date in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, identical in terms with those rights provided in KRS 21.400(2) and (3) in the Judicial Retirement Plan for members of that plan, except that the reduction in a legislators’ service retirement allowance for early retirement shall be at the rate of five percent (5%) of the allowance for each year that retirement precedes the normal retirement date.

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, each legislator in office on July 1, 1982, that is a member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, who retires on or after his or her normal retirement date, shall receive a service retirement allowance, payable monthly, on a formula equal to that of a justice or judge of the Court of Justice with an equivalent service entrance date, but in no event less than that specified in subsection (1) of this section, of his or her final compensation multiplied by the number of years of his or her service, but in no event to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final compensation. For this purpose, “final compensation” means the average monthly creditable compensation as determined in KRS 61.510(13) of the three (3) years during which the member had the highest creditable legislative compensation.

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, a member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan with a service entrance date after July 1, 1982 but prior to January 1, 2014, who retires on or after his or her normal retirement date, shall receive a service retirement allowance, payable monthly during his or her lifetime, in an amount per month equal to two and seventy-five one-hundredths percent (2.75%) of his or her final compensation multiplied by the number of years of his or her service, but in no event to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final compensation. For this purpose, “final compensation” means the average monthly creditable compensation as determined in KRS 61.510(13) of the member for services as a legislator for the three (3) years during which the member had the highest creditable legislative compensation.

Subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall not apply to members who begin participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 15, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 458, § 8, effective April 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; 2003, ch. 128, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 86, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 120, § 15, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 55, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.